Mississippi statutes. Title 1. Laws and Statutes
Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation

§ 1-1-101.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the compilation, revision and publication of legislation enacted by the Legislature is a legislative function.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1996).

§ 1-1-103.
Creation of Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation; composition; appointment and compensation of members; chairman; attendance at meetings by proxies; transaction of business by committee; meetings; payment of expenses.

There is created the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation, which is hereinafter referred to as the “joint committee.” The joint committee shall be composed of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Lieutenant Governor of the State of Mississippi, the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Mississippi State Senate, the Chairman of the Rules Committee of the House of Representatives, the Chairman of the Senate Rules Committee, four (4) members of the House of Representatives to be named by the Speaker of the House, and four (4) members of the Senate to be named by the Lieutenant Governor. If any ex officio member of the joint committee holds two (2) positions entitling him to membership on the committee, the Speaker of the House or the Lieutenant Governor, as the case may be, shall appoint another member of the respective house to membership on the committee. The chairmanship of the committee shall alternate for twelve-month periods, beginning on May 1 of each year, between the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Lieutenant Governor, with the Speaker of the House of Representatives serving as the first chairman. In the absence of the Chairman of the House Rules Committee or of the Senate Rules Committee, the vice chairman of that committee shall be entitled to attend; if the vice chairman is unable to attend or if an appointed member is unable to attend, another legislator may be designated to attend by the Speaker of the House or the Lieutenant Governor, as the case may be. If the Speaker of the House or the Lieutenant Governor is unable to attend a meeting, he may designate a legislator to substitute for him at that meeting. Any person serving as such a designated proxy shall have a vote at the meeting he was selected to attend and also when attending, shall receive compensation and expenses in the same manner and amount as regular members of the joint committee.

There shall be no business transacted, including adoption of rules of procedure, without the presence of a quorum of the joint committee. A quorum shall be eight (8) members, to consist of four (4) members from the House of Representatives and four (4) members from the Senate. No action shall be valid unless approved by the majority of those members present and voting, entered upon the minutes of the joint committee and signed by the chairman and vice chairman.

In addition to their legislative salaries as provided by law, the members of the committee shall receive per diem as authorized by law for their services in carrying out the duties of the committee and, in addition thereto, shall receive a daily expense allowance equal to the maximum daily expense rate allowable to employees of the federal government for travel in the high rate geographical area of Jackson, Mississippi, as may be established by federal regulations, including mileage as authorized by Section 25-3-41. However, in no case shall the members of the committee draw per diem while the Legislature is in regular or special session, except that members may receive the per diem and expenses authorized by this section when the Legislature is in session but in recess under the terms of a concurrent resolution, or in recess during a special session.

The committee shall meet at least one (1) time during the interim that the Legislature is not in regular session, and the chairman may call additional meetings at such times as he deems necessary or advisable.

All expenses incurred by and on behalf of the committee shall be paid from funds appropriated therefor, or from a sum to be provided in equal portion from the contingency funds of the House of Representatives and the Senate.

Upon the request of the joint committee, the Attorney General shall provide legal assistance or legal representation to the committee on any matter within the jurisdiction of the committee, including bringing suits on behalf of the committee and representing the committee in any suits brought against the committee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 483, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2009).

§ 1-1-105.
Committee staff.

The Director of the House Legislative Services Office and the Director of the Senate Legislative Services Office shall assist the joint committee with regard to staffing the committee to the extent feasible. The joint committee shall appoint one (1) attorney employed by the House Legislative Services Office and one (1) attorney employed by the Senate Legislative Services Office to serve as co-counsel for the committee and as liaisons to the publishing company or companies with which the joint committee has contracted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1996).

§ 1-1-107.
General powers and duties of committee.

The joint committee shall have the following powers and duties:

To select and contract with a reputable and competent publishing company on such terms and conditions and at such prices as it may deem proper for the editing, printing, indexing, annotating, binding and publishing of all the acts of the Legislature passed since adjournment of the 1998 Session of the Mississippi Legislature and annually thereafter, provided that the expenditure of state funds shall be contingent upon the Legislature appropriating the necessary funds therefor. Nothing in Chapter 546, Laws of 1998 or in Chapter 502, Laws of 1996, shall be construed to render invalid or impair the obligations of any contract entered into on behalf of the State of Mississippi on or before September 30, 1988, and any revisions or modifications to such contract other than extending the contract beyond September 30, 1998, for any of the purposes set forth in Chapter 546, Laws of 1998 or in Chapter 502, Laws of 1996.

To undertake such substantive revisions, recodifications and compilations of the Mississippi Code of 1972, and subsequent amendments thereto, as may be necessary or as may be directed by the Legislature.

To formulate with the publishing company all the details associated with the codification of the laws enacted by the Mississippi Legislature.

To review, approve or disapprove the work of the publishing company in preparing, supplementing, indexing or revising the Mississippi Code of 1972, or any volume, pocket part or portion thereof.

To grant exclusive or nonexclusive publication and sales rights to the Mississippi Code of 1972, and subsequent amendments thereto, or portions thereof to the publishing company.

In its discretion, to seek the advice and assistance of members and committees of the Mississippi Bar Association.

To provide for the preparation and introduction of legislation containing its recommendations for the revisions in substance and form or both, or the repeal or amendment of statutes or portions thereof.

To provide for procedures for the implementation or execution of its powers and duties.

To take such other action or exercise such additional powers as may be necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 4; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-1-109.
Authority of committee relating to preparation of legislative acts for publication.

In preparing the acts of the Legislature for publication in the Mississippi Code of 1972 after the adjournment of each session and without altering the sense, meaning or effect of the acts, the joint committee is authorized to:

Correct the spelling of words;

Change capitalization for the purpose of uniformity;

Correct manifest typographical and grammatical errors;

Substitute the proper code section number, chapter number, or other number or designation for the terms “this act,” and similar words or phrases;

Change cross-reference numbers to agree with renumbered chapters, code sections or portions of the Code;

Substitute the proper calendar date for “the effective date of this chapter” and other phrases of similar import;

Correct manifest errors in references to laws;

Correct inaccurate references to the titles of officers, the names of departments or other agencies of the state, local governments, or the federal government, and such other name changes as are necessary to be consistent with the laws of the state;

Insert or delete hyphens in words so as to follow correct grammatical usage;

Change nouns from the singular to the plural or vice versa for purposes of style and grammar;

Change punctuation for purposes of uniformity and consistency of style; and

Integrate the amendments that may have been made in more than one (1) act of the Legislature in a single session to the same code section or provisions of law, so that all versions of the same code section or law that were enacted during a single session may become effective, if effectuating all such amendments is consistent with the intent of the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 5; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-1-111.
Approval by committee of manuscript of supplements and replacement volumes prepared by publishing company.

From and after July 1, 1998, the manuscript of acts of the Mississippi Legislature that have been edited, compiled, annotated and indexed by the publishing company holding the contract with the Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation shall be submitted to the joint committee for its approval and acceptance after each regular session of the Legislature. Upon the approval and acceptance of the manuscript by the joint committee, the same shall be printed in insertable pocket supplement form or replacement bound volume or volumes where necessary, containing appropriate chapters, titles and subdivisions of titles.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1996).